Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-225 Delivery of policy. (a)
Subject to the insurer's requirements as to payment of premium, every policy
shall be mailed or delivered to the insured or to the person entitled thereto
within a reasonable period of time after its issuance.

(b) In the event the original policy is
delivered or is so required to be delivered to or for deposit with any seller,
mortgagee or pledgee of any motor vehicle or aircraft, and in which policy any
interest of the purchaser, mortgagor or pledgor in or with reference to such
vehicle or aircraft is insured, a duplicate of the policy or memorandum setting
forth the type of coverage, limits of liability, premiums for the respective
coverages, and duration of the policy, shall be delivered by the seller,
mortgagee or pledgee to each such purchaser, mortgagor or pledgor named in the
policy or coming within the group of persons designated in the policy to be so
included. If the policy does not provide coverage of legal liability for
injury to persons or damage to the property of third parties, a conspicuous
statement of such fact shall be printed, written or stamped on the face of the
duplicate policy or memorandum. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next